Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3805
County board; powers.

A county board of a county that has adopted a coordinated program for the management of black-tailed prairie dogs under section 23-3803 may:

(1) Employ personnel and expend funds for the purchase of materials, machinery, and equipment to carry out its duties and responsibilities under the Black-Tailed Prairie Dog Management Act;

(2) Issue general and individual notices as provided in section 23-3806 for the management of colonies;

(3) Examine property within the county for the purpose of determining the location of colonies; and

(4) Assign performance of elements of the black-tailed prairie dog management plan, including, but not limited to, investigation of reports or complaints regarding unmanaged prairie dog colonies.

Laws 2012, LB473, § 5;

Laws 2022, LB805, § 10.
July 21, 2022